Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.065

Obligations issued or guaranteed by multilateral development bank.

An association may invest in obligations issued or guaranteed by any multilateral development bank in which the United States government formally participates. Such investment in any one multilateral development bank shall not exceed five percent of the association's assets.

[ 1985 c 301 s 3.]